Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.126.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Eligible participant" means a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe as defined in RCW 43.376.010 who files a financial aid application approved by the office and enrolls in a state-registered apprenticeship program.

(2) "Gift aid" has the same definition as in RCW 28B.145.010.

(3) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance within the student achievement council.

(4) "State-registered apprenticeship program" means an approved apprenticeship program under chapter 49.04 RCW that has been approved to participate in state financial aid programs.

[ 2024 c 203 s 2.]